District of Columbia statutes.
25-207

ABRA Director and staff.

(a)

The Board, with the advice and consent of the Council, shall appoint a Director of ABRA for a renewable 4-year term. The Director shall be removed by the Board for just and reasonable cause.

(b)

The Director shall organize the personnel and property transferred by § 25-203 and, within the limits provided in this chapter and annual appropriations, shall employ staff as needed to carry out the function of ABRA.

History

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959

Section References

This section is referenced in § 25-101.

Short Title

Short title: Section 6022 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle H of title VI of the act may be cited as the “Targeted Grant-Making Authority for the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Administration Act of 2008”.

Editor's Notes

Section 6023 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided: “Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Administration shall have the authority to issue grants, as directed in the Fiscal Year 2009 Budget Request Act, passed on final reading on May 13, 2008 (Enrolled version of Bill 17-679) (‘Act’), to effectuate the purposes of the Act.”